Washington statutes.
RCW 36.150.010

County assumption of county ferry district authority.

Any county with a population of one million or more in which a county ferry district has been established pursuant to RCW 36.54.110 through 36.54.190 with boundaries coterminous with the boundaries of the county may by ordinance or resolution of the county legislative authority assume the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of the county ferry district in accordance with this chapter.

[ 2014 c 51 s 1.]